Washington statutes.
RCW 42.24.120

Advancements for travel expenses—Municipal corporation or political subdivision officers and employees.

Whenever it becomes necessary for an elected or appointed official or employee of the municipal corporation or political subdivision to travel and incur expenses, the legislative body of such municipal corporation or political subdivision may provide, in the manner that local legislation is officially enacted, reasonable allowances to such officers and employees in advance of expenditure. Such advance shall be made under appropriate rules and regulations to be prescribed by the state auditor.

[ 1969 c 74 s 1.]